src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON LEED-PRT
 +Sg1:%>eʹjjem             K  ; !
 +Sg2:%>eʹjjiǩ             K  ; !
 +Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>eʹjjik             K  ; !
 +Sg3:%>eäi              K  ; !
 +Err/Orth+Sg3:%>eei              K  ; !
 +Err/Orth+Sg3:%>äi              K  ; !
 +Pl1:%>eeiʹm             K  ; !
 +Pl2:%>eeiʹd             K  ; !
 +Pl3:%>eʹjje              K  ; !
 +Sg4:%>eʹjješ K ; ! 
 +ConNeg:eämˈmaž K ; !
 +ConNeg:eämˈma K ; !
 +ConNeg:eäm K ; !


! Imperative
! - - - - - - -
! teevvad
! 
!

! tieʹtted

! teeʹmeed
!LEXICON KAMRDED-IMPRT
! +Sg3:%>ââǥǥas          K  ; !WG
! +Pl1:%>âkap                    K  ;
! +Pl2:%>eʹǩed           K  ;
! +Pl3:%>âkaz            K  ;

LEXICON LEED-IMPRT
 +Sg3:%>eäǥǥas          K  ; !WG
 +Pl1:%>eäkˈkap                    K  ;
 +Pl2:%>eäkˈku           K  ;
 +Pl2:%>eäkˈkveʹted           K  ;
 +Pl3:%>eäkˈkaz            K  ;




! Potentialis & Konditionalis
! not including +Pot+Sg3
! - - - - - - - - - - - - - -
LEXICON VSUF-INF_YD
+Inf:%>âd K ;
+Inf+Err/Orth-a-y:%>ad K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>âp K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>veʹted K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>âm K ;
+Imprt+Pl1:%>âp K ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>âd K ;
+Actio+Ess:%>men K ;
+Actio:%>âm K ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAct+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>âm N_AANAR ; ! mõõnnâm
+Der+Der/NomAct+Der+Der/nalla+Adv:%>âm»nalla K ;
+Act+PrsPrc:%>i K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>âm K ;
 DEVERBAL-NOUN_mOsh ;
+Der+Der/oottyd+V:»õõtt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Der+Der/oollyd+V:»õõll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NOM-AG_YD ; ! 

LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_YD
+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;
+Imprt+Pl3:%>az K ; !FIXME


LEXICON VSUF-INF_AD
+Inf:%>ad K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>ap K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>veʹted K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>am K ;
+Imprt+Pl1:%>ap K ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>ad K ;
+Actio+Ess:%>men K ;
+Actio:%>am K ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Actio:@C.NeedNoun@%>am N_AANAR ;
+Actio+Der+Der/nalla+Adv:%>am»nalla K ;
 VSUF-PRSPRC_AD ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>am K ;
 DEVERBAL-NOUN_mOsh ;
+Der+Der/oottyd+V:»õõtt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Der+Der/oollyd+V:»õõll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@ai NOM-AG_AD ;

LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_AD
+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;

!+Imprt+Pl3:%>az K ; VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD

LEXICON VSUF-CHED_ED
+Der+Der/ched+V:»âč V_AALGXTED ;

LEXICON VSUF-INF_ED
+Inf:%>ed K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>ep K ;
+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>veʹted K ;
+Imprt+Pl1:%>ep K ;
+Imprt+Pl2:%>ed K ;
+Actio+Ess:%>em%^RmVow%>en K ;
+Actio:%>em K ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAct+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>em  N_AANAR ;
+Der+Der/NomAct+Der+Der/nalla+Adv:%>em»nalla K ;
+Err/Orth: DEVERBAL-NOUN_mOsh ;
+Err/Orth+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;
+Err/Orth+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;

LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRS-SG3_ED
+Ind+Prs+Sg3: K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>am K ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>am K ; !HERE or ONE LEXICON UP
 DEVERBAL-NOUN_mOsh ;
+Der+Der/oottyd+V:»õõtt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Der+Der/oollyd+V:»õõll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Err/Orth+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;

LEXICON DEVERBAL-NOUN_mOsh
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@»mõ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}š N_SAJOS ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Err/Orth+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@»mu%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}š N_SAJOS ;

LEXICON DEVERBAL-NOUN_ummush
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>ummuš N_MAINSTUMMUSH ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Err/Orth+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>umu%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}š0 N_SAJOS ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Err/Orth+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/musj+N:@C.NeedNoun@%>ummu%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}š N_SAJOS ;


LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_ED !!= * @CODE@ puätˈtaz
+Imprt+Pl3:%>az K ;
+Der+Der/jed+Der+Der/Caus+V:%>at TV_SHORRNED ;

!
LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_YD
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>em K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>iǩ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>ik K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>e K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>eš K ;
LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_AD
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>um K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>uk K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>u K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>uš K ;
+Der+Der/jed+Der+Der/Caus+V:%>ât TV_KHIORGGNED ;

LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRT-PL3_ED
+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%>em K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%>iǩ K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>ik K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%>e K ;
+Ind+Prt+Sg4:%>eš K ;

LEXICON FOR-VSUF-PRSPRC_ED !!= * @CODE@ (11) 
!! Vowel_raising, palatalization, Cons-grade-retension
 VSUF-PRSPRC_ED ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NOM-AG_ED ;


!
LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_
!! VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD, VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD and VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED come here
+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%>i K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>im K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>in K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%>iim K ;
+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%>id K ;

!
LEXICON VSUF-I-POTKOND_YD
 VSUF-I-POTKOND ;
+Pot+Sg3:%>âž   K ;
 VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_ ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>am K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ak K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>ât K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
+Imprt+Sg2: K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
 VABESS ;
 GER_ ;
+Der+Der/Caus+V:»ât  TV_AALGXTED ;
+Der+Der/Caus+Der+Der/oottyd+V:»t»õõtt IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
+Der+Der/Caus+Der+Der/oollyd+V:»t»õõll TV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NOM-AG_YD_NO-PL-NOM ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»ast VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»âst VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/st+V:»st VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/InchL+V:»škuätt V_SHKUEAQTTED ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/stoollyd+V:»stõõll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;

LEXICON VSUF-I-POTKOND_AD
 VSUF-I-POTKOND ;
+Pot+Sg3:%>až   K ;
+Imprt+Sg3:%>as K ;
:%>a VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_ ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>am K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ak K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>at K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;

+Imprt+Sg3:%>as K ;
+Imprt+Sg2: K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
 VABESS ;
 GER_ ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@ai NOM-AG_AD_NO-PL-NOM ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»ast VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»ast VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+Err/Orth+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/st+V:»st VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/InchL+V:»škuätt V_SHKUEAQTTED ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Der+Der/stoollyd+V:»stõõll V_LAUKKOOLLYD ;


LEXICON VSUF-POTENTIAL_ED
+Pot+Sg3:%>ež K ;
 POTENTIAL ;
 VSUF-IND-PRT-SG3-PL1-PL2_ ;
@C.NeedNoun@+Der+Der/NomAg+N:@C.NeedNoun@i NOM-AG_ED_NO-PL-NOM ;

LEXICON VABESS
+VAbess:%>ǩâni K ;
+VAbess:%>kani K ;
+VAbess:%>ǩani K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>kâni K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>kâna K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>ǩeânai K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>ǩenai K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>ǩeânnai K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+VAbess:%>ǩânai K ;


LEXICON GER_
: DenominalAdjsCShort ; !!= * @CODE@ (Feist 2012: 200-201) +Der+Der/teqm
+Ger+Instr:%>eeʹl K ; !FIX-ME
+Ger+Ess:%>eeʹn K ; !FIX-ME +Ger+Ess

+Ger+Loc:%>eeʹst K ; !FIX-ME +Ger+Loc
! CHECK-ME
+Ger+Loc+PxSg1:%>eeʹstan K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxSg2:%>eeʹstad K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxSg3:%>eeʹstes K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxPl1:%>eeʹsteen K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxPl2:%>eeʹsteed K ;
+Ger+Loc+PxPl3:%>eeʹsteez K ;


LEXICON VSUF-CONDITIONAL_ED  !!= * @CODE@ (7)
+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%>am K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>ak K ;
 CONDITIONAL ;
+Imprt+Sg3:%>as K ;

LEXICON VSUF-IND-PRS-CONNEG_ED !!= * @CODE@ (6)
+Imprt+Sg2: K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;
+Ind+Prs+Sg4:%>et K ;
 VABESS ;
 GER_ ; 

+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;

+Der+Der/st+V:»ast VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-SG3 ;
+Der+Der/st+V:»est VSUF-VUEJTED-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Der+Der/st+V:»st VSUF-VUEJTED-ELSE ; !!= * @CODE@ no allegro


LEXICON VSUF-I-POTKOND
 POTENTIAL ;
 CONDITIONAL ;

LEXICON POTENTIAL
 +Pot+Sg1:%>žem K	;
 +Pot+Sg2:%>žiǩ K	;
 +Pot+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>žik K	;
 +Pot+Pl1:%>žep K	; ! How are these related?
 +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pot+Pl1:%>žim K	; ! Are there sub standards?
 +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Pot+Pl1:%>žin K	; !
 +Pot+Pl2:%>žid K	;
 +Pot+Pl3:%>že K	;
 +Pot+Sg4:%>žet K ;
 +Pot+ConNeg:%>že K ;

LEXICON CONDITIONAL
 +Cond+Sg1:%>čem K	;
 +Cond+Sg2:%>čiǩ K	;
 +Cond+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>čik K	;
 +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cond+Sg2:%>čeǩ K	;
 +Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Use/SpellNoSugg+Cond+Sg2+Err/Orth-k-kh:%>ček K	;
 +Cond+Sg3:%>či K	;
 +Cond+Pl1:%>čim K	; ! How are these related?
 +Cond+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>čep K	; ! Are there substandards? 
 +Cond+Pl1+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:%>čin K	; !
 +Cond+Pl2:%>čid K	;
 +Cond+Pl3:%>če K	;
 +Cond+Sg4:%>češ K ;
 +Cond+ConNeg:%>če K ;


LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_YD
+Imprt+ConNegII:%>u K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;
+Der+Der/jed+Der+Der/Caus+V:%>ât TV_KHIORGGNED ;
+Err/Orth: FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_AD
+Imprt+ConNegII:%>u K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;
LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT-PL3_AD
+Imprt+Pl3:%>az K ;
+Err/Orth: FOR-ALLEGRO-DEVERBAL-DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VSUF-IMPRT-CONNEGII_ED
+Imprt+ConNegII:%>u K ;
+Pass+PrfPrc:%>um K ;

! Suffix series II

! Not written

! Other series
! - - - - - -

LEXICON VSUF-PRSPRC_AD
+Act+PrsPrc:ai K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:ai K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%^CC2C%>ai K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:ai K ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a%{ʼØ%}i NMN_PRSPRC-VVKK-AI ;

LEXICON VSUF-PRSPRC_ED
+Act+PrsPrc:%>i K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%>i K ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%^CC2C%>i K ;
+Use/NGminip+Use/NG+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom:%>i K ;
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:%>%{ʼØ%}i NMN_PRSPRC-VVCC-I ; !CHECKME 2016-04-22
